Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.642

Biodiesel fuel blends—Use by agencies—Annual report.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5801-S.SL) ***

(1) Effective June 1, 2006, for agencies complying with the ultra-low sulfur diesel mandate of the United States environmental protection agency for on-highway diesel fuel, agencies shall use biodiesel as an additive to ultra-low sulfur diesel for lubricity, provided that the use of a lubricity additive is warranted and that the use of biodiesel is comparable in performance and cost with other available lubricity additives. The amount of biodiesel added to the ultra-low sulfur diesel fuel shall be not less than two percent.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, effective June 1, 2009, state agencies are required to use a minimum of 20 percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of all diesel purchases made by the agencies for the operation of the agencies' diesel-powered vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment.

(3) All state agencies using biodiesel fuel shall, beginning on July 1, 2016, file annual reports with the department of enterprise services documenting the use of the fuel and a description of how any problems encountered were resolved.

(4) By December 1, 2009, the department of enterprise services shall:

(a) Report to the legislature on the average true price differential for biodiesel by blend and location; and

(b) Examine alternative fuel procurement methods that work to address potential market barriers for in-state biodiesel producers and report these findings to the legislature.

(5) During the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, the Washington state ferries is required to use a minimum of five percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of all diesel purchases made by the Washington state ferries for the operation of the Washington state ferries diesel-powered vessels, as long as the price of a B5 or B10 biodiesel blend does not exceed the price of conventional diesel fuel by five percent or more.

[ 2023 c 472 s 703; 2021 c 333 s 703; 2019 c 416 s 703; 2017 c 313 s 703; 2016 c 197 s 2; 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 701; 2013 c 306 s 701; 2012 c 86 s 802; 2010 c 247 s 701; 2009 c 470 s 716; 2007 c 348 s 201; 2006 c 338 s 10; 2003 c 17 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 472: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 16, 2023]." [ 2023 c 472 s 1202.]

Effective date—2021 c 333: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 18, 2021]." [ 2021 c 333 s 1302.]

Effective date—2019 c 416: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 21, 2019]." [ 2019 c 416 s 1202.]

Effective date—2017 c 313: "Except for sections 705 and 706 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 16, 2017]." [ 2017 c 313 s 1302.]

Effective date—2015 1st sp.s. c 10: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [June 11, 2015]." [ 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 1302.]

Effective date—2013 c 306: See note following RCW 47.64.170.

Effective date—2012 c 86: See note following RCW 47.76.360.

Effective date—2010 c 247: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 30, 2010]." [ 2010 c 247 s 802.]

Effective date—2009 c 470: See note following RCW 46.68.170.

Findings—2007 c 348: See RCW 43.325.005.

Findings—Intent—2006 c 338: See note following RCW 19.112.110.

Effective date—2006 c 338: See RCW 19.112.903.

Findings—2003 c 17: "The legislature recognizes that:

(1) Biodiesel is less polluting than petroleum diesel;

(2) Using biodiesel in neat form or blended with petroleum diesel significantly reduces air toxics and cancer-causing compounds as well as the soot associated with petroleum diesel exhaust;

(3) Biodiesel degrades much faster than petroleum diesel;

(4) Biodiesel is less toxic than petroleum fuels;

(5) The United States environmental protection agency's new emission standards for petroleum diesel that take effect June 1, 2006, will require the addition of a lubricant to ultra-low sulfur diesel to counteract premature wear of injection pumps;

(6) Biodiesel provides the needed lubricity to ultra-low sulfur diesel;

(7) Biodiesel use in state-owned diesel-powered vehicles provides a means for the state to comply with the alternative fuel vehicle purchase requirements of the energy policy act of 1992, P.L. 102-486; and

(8) The state is in a position to set an example of large scale use of biodiesel in diesel-powered vehicles and equipment." [ 2003 c 17 s 1.]